Hawaii, session 2026, SB3167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that established ocean industries, including shipping and fishing, have evolved into innovation-driven sectors such as ocean technology, marine robotics, offshore energy, and ocean data systems.  The World Bank defines the "blue economy" as the sustainable use of ocean resources to support economic growth, improve livelihoods, and create jobs, while maintaining the long-term health of ocean ecosystems. The legislature further finds that the blue economy represents one of the fastest-growing economic opportunities globally, encompassing industries such as marine construction, ship and boat building, marine transportation, energy, tourism and recreation, fisheries and fishery-related businesses, aquaculture, marine biotechnology, ocean and coastal management, and conservation.  The blue economy is projected to double in value to an estimated $3 trillion by 2030, with growth increasingly driven by technological innovation. The legislature also finds that Hawaii is uniquely positioned to be a nationally competitive leader in the blue economy.  Located at the center of the Pacific Ocean, Hawaii serves as a strategic crossroads for ocean-based industries, research, and innovation, building upon the longstanding knowledge and stewardship Native Hawaiians have maintained with the ocean. However, the legislature finds that, to remain competitive with other coastal states and international regions, the State must modernize its approach and more strategically leverage its technological, infrastructure, and manufacturing capabilities, including marine biotechnology, autonomous maritime systems, maritime cybersecurity, shipping, ports and harbors, and ocean data and observation systems. The legislature further finds that numerous states, including Alaska, California, Connecticut, Florida, Maine, Michigan, Mississippi, Oregon, Rhode Island, and Washington, have advanced their participation in the blue economy through strategic initiatives, enacted legislation, and the development of ocean technology hubs. The legislature further finds that the Hawaii technology development corporation, as the state agency supporting technology development and commercialization, is an appropriate entity to coordinate efforts to advance the blue economy.  The Hawaii technology development corporation has existing relationships across public, private, academic, and federal partners and has the capacity to support strategy development, facilitate access to capital, support workforce development, and advance the commercialization of ocean-related technologies. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the Hawaii technology development corporation to conduct a study supporting the development and coordination of the State's blue economy strategy, including activities related to maritime, aquaculture, coastal resiliency, and ocean observation and sensing technologies. SECTION 2. (a)  The Hawaii technology development corporation shall procure the services of a third-party consultant to develop a statewide blue economy and ocean technology and innovation strategy that supports the State's blue economy objectives and the development, coordination, and implementation of ocean technology and ocean initiatives, including but not limited to: (1)  Developing a strategy that provides a clear vision, implementation roadmap with milestones, defined stakeholder roles, and actionable implementation steps; (2)  Coordinating cross-agency collaboration with missions that intersect with the blue economy, including but not limited to the department of business, economic development, and tourism; department of land and natural resources; department of transportation; department of agriculture; Hawaii emergency management agency; office of Hawaiian affairs; university of Hawaii; natural energy laboratory of Hawaii; and other relevant entities; (3)  Conducting research and analysis of ocean-related industries, including regulatory and permitting frameworks, capital needs, workforce requirements, infrastructure gaps, innovative solutions, and opportunities for publicprivate partnerships and community engagement; (4)  Pursuing public, private, and federal funding opportunities to support the development, deployment, and commercialization of ocean technology and innovation; (5)  Providing technical, operational, and project management support to the corporation to accelerate its ocean innovation initiatives during the interim period before the establishment of permanent staff and sustained resources; (6)  Designing workforce development programs aligned with maritime, coastal resiliency, and aquaculture sector needs; and (7)  Supporting planning, feasibility analysis, and the development of conceptual, architectural, and site plans necessary to advance the establishment of a statewide ocean technology innovation hub to support research, commercialization, workforce training, and public-private collaboration in ocean and maritime technologies. (b) The Hawaii technology development corporation shall submit an annual report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session for the duration of the third-party consultant's contract. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $500,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Hawaii technology development corporation to procure a third-party consultant to support the development, coordination, and implementation of ocean technology and innovation initiatives. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii technology development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________